Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-504
Abstracting; counties over 5,000 population; county officers ineligible; exception.

No county official or deputy, clerk, or assistant to such official, except the county attorney and deputy county attorney, in counties having a population of over five thousand shall engage in the business of compiling abstracts of title to real estate in the State of Nebraska while holding such office, and any certification of an abstract of title by any such person in violation of this section shall be void.

Any registered abstracter holding any such office on August 30, 1981, shall continue to be eligible to engage in the business of compiling abstracts of title so long as he or she continues to hold such office.

Laws 1933, c. 125, § 1, p. 499;

Laws 1935, c. 148, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-601;

R.S.1943, § 76-504;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 270;

Laws 1981, LB 409, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 3.